Delaware, session 153, HB148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 1922, Title 24 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1922. Disciplinary proceedings; appeal. (e) Letters of Concern. â (1) If the Board determines after an investigation that a violation of this chapter or of the regulations enacted pursuant to this chapter warranting formal disciplinary action has not occurred, but that an act or omission of the licensee is a matter of concern and that licenseeâs practice may be improved if the licensee is made aware of the concern, the Board may issue a non-disciplinary confidential letter of concern regarding the licenseeâs act or omission. (2) If a licensee receives a total of 3 letters of concern under this section, the Board may hold a hearing to assess the licenseeâs professional competency to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public. At such hearing, all of the licenseeâs letters of concern may be deemed no longer confidential and may be admitted into evidence.